Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.080

College board—Offices and office equipment, including necessary expenses.

Suitable offices and office equipment shall be provided by the state for the college board in the city of Olympia, and the college board may incur the necessary expense for office furniture, stationery, printing, incidental expenses, and other expenses necessary for the administration of this chapter.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.50.080. Prior: 1967 ex.s. c 8 s 8. Formerly RCW 28.85.080.]